src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc
LEXICON Cardinal
+Num+Card: # ;

LEXICON Ordinal
+Num+Ord:%{S%} # ;

LEXICON RomanDeriv
+Card: # ;
+Ord:%>e # ;

LEXICON Un
+Num+Card+Masc+Nom+Sg:uns # ;
+Num+Card+Masc+Nom+Sg:ungs # ;
+Num+Card+Masc+Obl+Sg:un # ;
+Num+Card+Masc+Obl+Sg:ung # ;
+Num+Card+Masc+Nom+Pl:un # ;
+Num+Card+Masc+Nom+Pl:ung # ;
+Num+Card+Masc+Obl+Pl:uns # ;
+Num+Card+Masc+Obl+Pl:ungs # ;
+Num+Card+Fem+Nom+Sg:une # ;
+Num+Card+Fem+Nom+Sg:unne # ;
+Num+Card+Fem+Obl+Sg:une # ;
+Num+Card+Fem+Obl+Sg:unne # ;
+Num+Card+Fem+Nom+Pl:unes # ;
+Num+Card+Fem+Obl+Pl:unes # ;

LEXICON Dous
+Num+Card+Masc+Nom+Pl:dui # ;
+Num+Card+Mac+Obl+Pl:dous # ;
+Num+Card+Mac+Obl+Pl:deus # ;
+Num+Card+Mac+Obl+Pl:deux # ;
+Num+Card+Fem+Nom+Pl:dous # ;
+Num+Card+Mac+Obl+Pl:deus # ;
+Num+Card+Mac+Obl+Pl:deux # ;
+Num+Card+Mac+Obl+Pl:does # ;

LEXICON Trois
+Num+Card+Masc+Nom+Pl:trei # ;
+Num+Card+Masc+Obl+Pl:treis # ;
+Num+Card+Fem+Nom+Pl:treis # ;
+Num+Card+Fem+Obl+Pl:treis # ;

LEXICON Vint
+Num+Card+Masc+Nom+Pl:vint # ;
+Num+Card+Masc+Obl+Pl:vinz # ;
+Num+Card+Fem+Nom+Pl:vinz # ;
+Num+Card+Fem+Obl+Pl:vinz # ;

LEXICON Cent
+Num+Card+Masc+Nom+Pl:cent # ;
+Num+Card+Masc+Obl+Pl:cen%{T%}s # ;
+Num+Card+Fem+Nom+Pl:cen%{T%}s # ;
+Num+Card+Fem+Obl+Pl:cen%{T%}s # ;

LEXICON Premier
+Num+Ord+Masc+Sg:premier # ;
+Num+Ord+Masc+Sg:premerain # ;
+Num+Ord+Masc+Sg:prim # ;
+Num+Ord+Masc+Pl:prims # ;
+Num+Ord+Masc+Pl:premiers # ; ! Verify
+Num+Ord+Masc+Pl:premerains # ; ! Verify
+Num+Ord+Fem+Sg:première # ;
+Num+Ord+Fem+Sg:premeraine # ;
+Num+Ord+Fem+Sg:prime # ;
+Num+Ord+Fem+Pl:primes # ;
+Num+Ord+Fem+Pl:premières # ; ! Verify
+Num+Ord+Fem+Pl:premeraines # ; ! Verify
:première DerAdv ;
:premeraine DerAdv ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!!€gt-norm: Numerals
!!€ prins:      premier+Num+Ord+Masc+Pl
!!€ premiers:   premier+Num+Ord+Masc+Pl
!!€ pramiers:   premier+Num+Ord+Masc+Pl
!!€ premerains: premier+Num+Ord+Masc+Pl
!!€ premereins: premier+Num+Ord+Masc+Pl
!!€ pramerains: premier+Num+Ord+Masc+Pl
!!€ pramereins: premier+Num+Ord+Masc+Pl
!!€ primes:     premier+Num+Ord+Fem+Pl
!!€ premières:  premier+Num+Ord+Fem+Pl
!!€ pramières:  premier+Num+Ord+Fem+Pl
!!€ premieres:  premier+Num+Ord+Fem+Pl
!!€ pramieres:  premier+Num+Ord+Fem+Pl
!!€ premeraines: premier+Num+Ord+Fem+Pl
!!€ premereines: premier+Num+Ord+Fem+Pl
!!€ prameraines: premier+Num+Ord+Fem+Pl
!!€ pramereines: premier+Num+Ord+Fem+Pl
!!€ quatre:     quatre+Num+Card
!!€ katre:      quatre+Num+Card
!!€ qatre:      quatre+Num+Card
!!€ vi:         sis+Num+Roman+Card
!!€ vj:         sis+Num+Roman+Card
!!€ vy:         sis+Num+Roman+Card
!!€ dui:        dous+Num+Card+Masc+Nom+Pl
!!€ duy:        dous+Num+Card+Masc+Nom+Pl
